Louisiana, session 2026, HB943.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S.22:2472 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2472. Child support insurance intercept; insurer compliance; enforcement
A. Every insurer doing business in this state shall comply with the
requirements of R.S. 46:236.1.13, including the obligation to conduct data matches
and to withhold and remit qualifying payments when notified by the Department of
Children and Family Services.
B. The commissioner of insurance shall have full enforcement authority over
insurer compliance with R.S. 46:236.1.13, including the authority to:
(1) Issue cease and desist orders.
(2) Impose administrative fines pursuant to R.S. 22:2.
(3) Conduct examinations and investigations.
(4) Adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this Section.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1303 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 943
C. Failure to comply with R.S. 46:236.1.13 shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice under R.S. 22:1964.
Section 2. R.S. 46:236.1.13 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§236.1.13. Family and child support programs; insurance data matching and
cooperation; responsibilities
A.(1) Each insurer shall, no later than five days prior to issuing a qualifying
payment, exchange information with the office of child support in the manner
prescribed by the department to verify whether a recipient owes debt for the support
of one or more children to the department or to a person receiving services from the
office of child support.
(2) To the extent feasible, the office of child support shall facilitate a secure
electronic process to exchange information with insurers pursuant to this Section.
The obligation of an insurer to exchange information with the office of child support
is discharged upon complying with the requirements of this Section.
(3) The exchange of information shall comply with privacy protections under
applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.
B. In order to determine whether a recipient of funds owes a debt being
enforced by the office of child support, all insurers doing business in the state that
issue qualifying payments to a recipient shall provide minimum identifying
information about the recipient to:
(1) An insurance claim data collection organization;
(2) The federal office of child support enforcement or the child support lien
network; or
(3) The office of child support enforcement directly in a manner satisfactory
to the department.
C. If an insurer is notified by the office of child support enforcement that a
recipient owes debt for the support of one or more children to the department or to
a person receiving services from the office of child support enforcement, the insurer
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1303 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 943
shall, upon the receipt of a notice issued by the department identifying the amount
of debt owed:
(1) Withhold from payment to the recipient the amount specified in the
notice; and
(2) Remit the amount withheld from payment to the department within
twenty days.
D. The department shall give priority over any withholding of payment
pursuant to Subsection C of this Section to any lien, claim, or demand for reasonable
claim-related attorneys’ fees, litigation expenses, any portion of a claim based on
damage or a loss of real or personal property, documented unpaid expenses incurred
for medical treatment causally related to the claim, and any money assigned or
designated as funeral or burial expenses.
E.(1) The department shall consider any information received from an
insurer as confidential. Such information shall be used or disclosed by the
department only for the purpose of collecting past-due child support or for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Section.
(2) Information provided by the department may not be used by the insurer
or its agent for any purpose other than conducting the data match, and may not be
disclosed to any person except to the extent necessary to conduct the data match.
The insurer or its agent shall destroy or erase all information provided to the insurer
after completion of a data match. This Subsection does not apply to data contained
in a child support lien or other encumbering instrument received from the department
after the data match process.
(3) An insurer or other entity described in Subsection B of this Section may
not be held liable in any civil or criminal action for any act made in good faith
pursuant to this Section including, but not limited to:
(a) Any disclosure of information to the department or the division of child
support; or
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1303 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 943
(b) The withholding of any money from payment to a recipient or the
remittance of such money to the department.
F. An insurer shall not delay the disbursement of a payment to a recipient to
comply with this Section. An insurer is not required to comply with Subsection C
of this Section if the notice issued by the department is received by the insurer after
the payment has disbursed. In the case of periodic payments, an insurer is not
required to comply with Subsection C of this Section with regard to any payments
disbursed before receipt of the notice, but shall comply with Subsection C of this
Section with regard to any payments scheduled after receipt of the notice.
G. If periodic payments will be made to a recipient, the insurer shall conduct
the exchange of information pursuant to Subsection A of this Section no later than
five days prior to each qualifying payment.
H. For the purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Recipient" means any person who:
(a) Brings a tort liability claim for bodily injury or wrongful death;
(b) Is receiving an annuity;
(c) Is receiving disability insurance benefits;
(d) Is receiving workers' compensation benefits; or
(e) Is a beneficiary under a life insurance policy.
(2) "Claim for bodily injury" does not include a claim for uninsured or
underinsured vehicle coverage or medical payments coverage under a motor vehicle
liability policy.
(3) "Insurance claim data collection organization" means an organization that
maintains a centralized database of information concerning insurance claims to assist
insurers that subscribe to the database in processing claims and detecting and
preventing fraud, and also cooperates and coordinates with the federal or state child
support entities to share relevant information for insurance intercept purposes.
(4) "Insurer" means:
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1303 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 943
(a) A domestic, foreign, or alien insurance company which provides
insurance of any kind, including but not limited to:
(i) life insurance.
(ii) health insurance.
(iii) liability insurance for an occurrence.
(iv) an annuity.
(v) Any combination of subparagraphs (i)-(iv) of this Paragraph.
(b) A Lloyd's plan.
(c) A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.
(d) A fraternal benefit society.
(e) A mutual aid association, including a mutual insurance company.
(f) A surplus lines insurer.
(g) A certified self-insurer granted a certificate of authority as authorized by
R.S. 23:1195 et seq.
(h) A governmental entity that self-insures, either individually or collectively
under an interlocal cooperation contract as authorized by R.S. 33:3061 et seq.
(5) "Qualifying payment" means a payment that is either a one-time lump
sum or an installment payment issued by an insurer doing business in the state,
which is made for the purpose of satisfying, compromising, or settling a tort or
insurance claim where the payment is in excess of $500 and is intended to go directly
to the recipient and not to a third party, such as a health care provider. It includes
any payment scheduled to be issued within five days of the data match required by
Subsection A.
(6) "Tort or insurance claim" means: (a) A claim for general damages, which
are also called noneconomic damages; or (b) a claim for lost wages. "Tort or
insurance claim" does not include claims for property damage under either liability
insurance or uninsured motorist insurance.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1303 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 943
Section 3. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Support Insurance
Intercept Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.